installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SFX C Y 106
SFX C   ce          c          ice
SFX C   e           i          [^i]ce
SFX C   e           i          [cijlr]e
SFX C   e           0          se
SFX C   e           im         [ccijlrs]e
SFX C   e           ich        [ccijlrs]e
SFX C   0           mi         [ccijls]e
SFX C   e           mi         re
SFX C   e           i          e
SFX C   e           im         e
SFX C   e           ich        e
SFX C   0           mi         e
SFX C   0           m          i
SFX C   o           a          o
SFX C   o           u          o
SFX C   o           em         o
SFX C   cky         cnost      cky
SFX C   cky         cnosti     cky
SFX C   cky         cnosti     cky
SFX C   cky         cnostem    cky
SFX C   cky         cnostech   cky
SFX C   cky         cnostmi    cky
SFX C   ci          zen        oci
SFX C   ci          zena       oci
SFX C   ci          zeno       oci
SFX C   ci          zeni       oci
SFX C   ci          zeny       oci
SFX C   ci          zenu       oci
SFX C   tit         cen        [^s]tit
SFX C   tit         cena       [^s]tit
SFX C   tit         ceno       [^s]tit
SFX C   tit         ceni       [^s]tit
SFX C   tit         ceny       [^s]tit
SFX C   tit         cenu       [^s]tit
SFX C   dit         zen        [^zz]dit
SFX C   dit         zena       [^zz]dit
SFX C   dit         zeno       [^zz]dit
SFX C   dit         zeni       [^zz]dit
SFX C   dit         zeny       [^zz]dit
SFX C   dit         zenu       [^zz]dit
SFX C   sit         sen        sit
SFX C   sit         sena       sit
SFX C   sit         seno       sit
SFX C   sit         seni       sit
SFX C   sit         seny       sit
SFX C   sit         senu       sit
SFX C   zit         zen        zit
SFX C   zit         zena       zit
SFX C   zit         zeno       zit
SFX C   zit         zeni       zit
SFX C   zit         zeny       zit
SFX C   zit         zenu       zit
SFX C   slit        slen       slit
SFX C   slit        slena      slit
SFX C   slit        sleno      slit
SFX C   slit        sleni      slit
SFX C   slit        sleny      slit
SFX C   slit        slenu      slit
SFX C   stit        sten       stit
SFX C   stit        stena      stit
SFX C   stit        steno      stit
SFX C   stit        steni      stit
SFX C   stit        steny      stit
SFX C   stit        stenu      stit
SFX C   zdit        zden       zdit
SFX C   zdit        zdena      zdit
SFX C   zdit        zdeno      zdit
SFX C   zdit        zdeni      zdit
SFX C   zdit        zdeny      zdit
SFX C   zdit        zdenu      zdit
SFX C   ahnout      azen       ahnout
SFX C   ahnout      azena      ahnout
SFX C   ahnout      azeno      ahnout
SFX C   ahnout      azeni      ahnout
SFX C   ahnout      azeny      ahnout
SFX C   ahnout      azenu      ahnout
SFX C   chnout      sen        chnout
SFX C   chnout      sena       chnout
SFX C   chnout      seno       chnout
SFX C   chnout      seni       chnout
SFX C   chnout      seny       chnout
SFX C   chnout      senu       chnout
SFX C   hnout       zen        [^ac]hnout
SFX C   hnout       zena       [^ac]hnout
SFX C   hnout       zeno       [^ac]hnout
SFX C   hnout       zeni       [^ac]hnout
SFX C   hnout       zeny       [^ac]hnout
SFX C   hnout       zenu       [^ac]hnout
SFX C   eknout      ecen       eknout
SFX C   eknout      ecena      eknout
SFX C   eknout      eceno      eknout
SFX C   eknout      eceni      eknout
SFX C   eknout      eceny      eknout
SFX C   eknout      ecenu      eknout
SFX C   sknout      sten       sknout
SFX C   sknout      stena      sknout
SFX C   sknout      steno      sknout
SFX C   sknout      steni      sknout
SFX C   sknout      steny      sknout
SFX C   sknout      stenu      sknout
SFX C   knout       cen        [^es]knout
SFX C   knout       cena       [^es]knout
SFX C   knout       ceno       [^es]knout
SFX C   knout       ceni       [^es]knout
SFX C   knout       ceny       [^es]knout
SFX C   knout       cenu       [^es]knout

SFX M Y 52
SFX M   o           a          [^c]o
SFX M   o           u          [^c]o
SFX M   o           e          dlo
SFX M   o           em         [^c]o
SFX M   o           um         [^ciy]o
SFX M   o           ech        [^cghkeiy]o
SFX M   o           ach        [ghk]o
SFX M   ko          cich       isko
SFX M   o           y          [^zscrcjiy]o
SFX M   o           i          [aeiouy]o
SFX M   o           im         [eiy]o
SFX M   o           ich        [eiy]o
SFX M   o           i          [zscrjeiy]o
SFX M   a           um         a
SFX M   a           ach        [ghk]a
SFX M   o           ech        [^ghkei]a
SFX M   a           y          [^zscrcji]a
SFX M   on          a          on
SFX M   on          u          on
SFX M   on          em         on
SFX M   on          i          on
SFX M   on          im         on
SFX M   on          ich        on
SFX M   on          i          on
SFX M   um          a          um
SFX M   um          u          um
SFX M   um          em         um
SFX M   um          i          [aeiouyaeiouyue]um
SFX M   um          im         [aeiouyaeiouuye]um
SFX M   um          um         [^aeiouyaeiouuye]um
SFX M   um          ich        [aeiouyaeiouuye]um
SFX M   um          ech        [^aeiouyaeiouuyek]um
SFX M   um          ach        kum
SFX M   um          i          [^hkrdtnbflmbsvz]um
SFX M   um          y          [hkrdtnbflmbsvz]um
SFX M   o           a          [^srn]co
SFX M   co          ka         [srn]co
SFX M   co          ku         [srn]co
SFX M   co          kem        [srn]co
SFX M   co          kum        [srn]co
SFX M   co          ky         [srn]co
SFX M   o           ich        [srn]co
SFX M   e           i          e
SFX M   0           m          [ee]
SFX M   e           i          e
SFX M   e           im         e
SFX M   e           ich        e
SFX M   e           i          e
SFX M   te          t          te
SFX M   e           i          me
SFX M   e           im         e
SFX M   e           ich        e
