installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
absolutorium/M
acko/MQ
adverbium/MQ
agnosticisticky/YCRN
aktinium/MQ
aktualisticky/YCR
albedo/MQ
alicyklicky/YCR
alopaticky/YCRN
aluminium/MQ
anabolikum/MQ
anaforicky/YCRN
anarchosyndikalisticky/YCR
Ankvice/C
anthelmintikum/MQ
antibiotikum/MQ
antiesencialisticky/YCR
antihistaminikum/MQ
antimykotikum/MQ
antipateticky/YCR
antiseptikum/MQ
antiteticky/YCRN
antroponymum/MQ
apoliticky/YCR
arboretum/MQ
Arnoltice/C
asfericky/YCRN
Assko/C
atrium/MQ
austroslavisticky/YCR
auticko/MQ
automaticky/YCRN
avizo/MQ
bahniste/M
balamutit/ACN
batolatko/MQ
behavioralisticky/YCR
Belusice/C
benesovsko/MQ
Bezdedice/C
bidacky/YCRN
bidelko/MQ
bioenergeticky/YCRN
biopareniste/M
Blahutovice/C
blejno/MQ
Bodamsko/C
Bohunovice/C
bolero/MQ
Boletice/C
boruvci/C
Braniborsko/C
bratrstvo/MQ
Bratrice/C
bronchopneumonicky/YCR
Breclavsko/C
brevno/MQ
budit/ACN
budoucno/MQ
byrokraticky/YCRN
capriccio/MQ
centristicky/YCRN
cesium/MQ
crescendo/MQ
cukrovanicky/YCRN
cadit/ACN
Cejkovice/C
celo/MQR
Cernikovice/C
ceskonemecky/YCRN
cihadlo/MQ
Cimelice/C
cmelacisko/MQ
Dacicko/C
Dasnice/C
decrescendo/MQ
dekabristicky/YCRN
delostrelectvo/MQ
Depoltice/C
Deum/M
diabolisticky/YCR
dilo/M
disharmonicky/YCR
divadlo/MQ
Dobromerice/C
dobro/MQ
Dobsice/C
dohlasit/ACN
dokvasit/ACN
domlatit/ACN
dopustit/ACN
doskociste/M
dostihnout/ACN
dotvrdit/ACN
dovyklidit/ACN
drasticky/YCRN
Drysice/C
drzadlo/MQ
drivi/C
dubnium/M
dustojnictvo/MQ
dvojpadlo/MQ
dvoranstvo/C
dzudo/MQ
eklipticky/YCRN
ekvinokcium/M
elasticky/YCRN
emko/MQ
energicky/YCR
epistemologicky/YCRN
esicko/MQ
esotericky/YCR
eufonicky/YCRN
europium/MQ
euroskepticisticky/YCR
existencionalisticky/YCR
fantasmagoricky/YCRN
fermium/MQ
feromagneticky/YCRN
folkloristicky/YCR
fortepiano/MQ
frankisticky/YCR
funkcionalisticky/YCR
gadolinium/MQ
galvanostaticky/YCRN
genocentricky/YCR
gesto/MQ
glaukoniticky/YCR
goricky/YCRN
Grisonsko/C
Gronsko/MQ
hafnium/MQ
harampadi/C
Havlovice/C
hekticky/YCRN
hermafroditicky/YCR
Hermankovice/C
Hesensko/MQ
historicky/YCRN
hlediste/M
Hlusice/C
hnizdo/MQR
Hodkovice/C
Holesovice/C
homeopatikum/MQ
hornictvo/C
hostit/ACN
housatko/MQ
housle/C
Hradecno/MQ
hradit/ACN
hrdelko/MQ
hruboskalsko/C
Hustenovice/C
Hutisko/MQ
hyenisticky/YCR
hypersonicky/YCR
hyzdit/ACTN
chebsko/MQ
chimericky/YCRN
Choratice/C
Chotilsko/MQ
Chroustovice/C
Chvalovice/C
idylicky/YCRN
iksko/MQ
inferno/MQ
intelektualisticky/YCR
iridium/MQ
ischiadicky/YCRN
Janeiro/MQ
Janovice/C
jelitko/MQ
jezero/MQR
Jicinsko/C
Jivno/MQ
Jutsko/C
kadmium/MQ
kaliko/MQ
kanapicko/MQ
Karlovarsko/C
kasemata/MQ
kejkle/C
kino/MQR
klepeto/MQ
klikatit/ACN
klubicko/MQ
kolegium/MQ
Kolodeje/C
kolodium/MQ
kombo/MQ
Konopiste/M
konzumisticky/YCR
Kopidlo/MQ
korzo/MQR
kourmo/MQ
Kozusice/C
kreacionisticky/YCR
krematorium/MQ
kropitko/MQ
Krenice/C
kresilko/MQ
krovicko/MQ
Kucharovice/C
kurikulum/MQ
kvasidlo/MQ
kvasnice/C
Labe/M
lawrencium/MQ
lehnicky/YCRN
lemovadlo/MQ
letadelko/MQ
lexikum/MQ
lezacky/YCRN
Lidecko/MQ
lidstvo/C
Livonsko/C
lizatko/MQ
Lovesice/C
loze/M
lyceum/MQ
magicky/YCRN
magnezium/MQ
Malkovice/C
Marseille/C
martyrium/MQ
mavatko/MQ
mechanicky/YCRN
mejdlicko/MQ
Merovice/C
mesto/MQR
mezipatro/MQ
mezopicky/YCRN
milenium/MQ
mimoliturgicky/YCR
ministerstvo/MQ
Mlecice/C
mleko/MQR
modulo/MQ
monogeneticky/YCR
moridlo/MQ
Mostecko/C
Mseno/MQ
mysterium/MQ
mytit/ACN
nadprirozeno/MQ
nadtrhnout/ACN
namastit/ACN
Napajadla/MQ
narodit/ACN
natrium/MQ
naturisticky/YCR
nedotknutelno/MQ
Nechranice/C
Nepomucenum/MQ
Neprobylice/C
Nezdice/C
nitrogenium/MQ
notoricky/YCR
novorozenatko/MQ
obcanstvo/C
obratiste/M
obrazit/ACXN
odemknout/ACTN
odium/MQ
odpichovatko/MQ
odrazit/ACXN
Oharice/C
ohybadlo/MQ
okyslicovadlo/MQ
Oldrichovice/C
opium/MQ
oplodit/ACN
oraniste/M
orograficky/YCRN
osivo/MQR
ostri/C
ovarium/MQ
pacifisticky/YCR
paleokoryto/MQ
paradigmaticky/YCRN
paraplicko/MQ
pasmo/MQ
pauperisticky/YCR
pecko/MQ
perfektum/MQ
peri/C
pericko/MQ
piskoviste/MQ
pizzicato/MQ
Plavno/MQ
plicko/MQ
plodit/ACN
plutonium/MQ
podhodnotit/ACN
podpole/M
podsadit/ACN
Pohorelice/C
poledne/M
polofasisticky/YCR
polo/MQ
pomastit/ACN
popraviste/M
popudit/ACN
posmevacky/YCRN
postskriptum/MQ
potvrdit/ACN
pouzdro/MQR
pradavno/C
pradlo/MQ
pravo/MQ
premorfologicky/YCR
prezidium/MQ
profylaktikum/MQ
prohodit/ACN
prosit/ACN
prosteradlo/MQ
protisocialisticky/YCR
prso/MQ
pradynko/MQ
Praslavice/C
predpoliticky/YCR
prechodit/ACN
prerazit/ACXN
presouvadlo/MQ
preudit/ACN
Prichovice/C
prisladit/ACN
Pritocno/MQ
pseudoadiabaticky/YCR
ptacatko/MQ
pyrrhonisticky/YCR
pyzamo/MQ
rahnovi/C
rahynko/MQ
raminko/MQ
rdousit/ACN
referendum/MQ
rhodium/MQ
rodiste/M
rondokubisticky/YCR
Rovensko/MQ
rozhostit/ACN
rozpocitadlo/MQ
rozrazit/ACXN
rumoviste/M
Rumunsko/C
rysovadlo/MQ
remeni/C
reseto/MQ
sacko/MQ
samostudium/MQ
scenaristicky/YCRN
seaborgium/M
selatko/MQ
sentimentalisticky/YCR
servo/MQ
schodiste/M
sjednotit/ACN
Skalsko/MQ
skore/M
Slatinice/C
sletiste/M
slovo/MQR
sluvko/MQ
Smrzice/C
snerovadlo/MQ
sofisticky/YCRN
sousedstvo/MQ
spinatko/MQ
spoluvlastnicky/YCRN
srdecko/MQ
starokalisnicky/YCRN
startoviste/M
stehno/MQR
storno/MQ
Strakonice/C
Stropnicky/YCRN
struhadlo/MQ
strihadlo/MQ
stvorenicko/MQ
sufisticky/YCR
susidlo/MQ
Svatonovice/C
symbioticky/YCR
symposium/MQ
synteticky/YCR
siditko/MQ
Silherovice/C
slapatko/MQ
Sumice/C
svihadlo/MQ
Tatrovice/C
tecko/MQ
telo/MQR
terarium/MQ
termogalvanicky/YCRN
tetraethylolovo/MQ
tiskatko/MQ
tomato/MQR
toricky/YCRN
tornado/MQ
transitivum/MQ
tricium/MQ
troficky/YCR
trsatko/MQ
Trebovice/C
tuzemsko/MQ
Tynistko/MQ
typicky/YCRN
udidlo/MQ
uhli/C
ukrotit/ACN
umyvadelko/MQ
upustit/ACN
usazovadlo/MQ
utopisticky/YCR
vakuum/MQ
Valassko/C
vcelstvo/MQ
veledilo/MQ
Velkopavlovicko/C
veno/MQ
veto/MQ
vidle/C
vino/MQR
vlakynko/MQ
vlichotit/ACN
volicstvo/MQ
Votice/C
vratidlo/MQ
vretanko/MQ
Vsemyslice/C
vyhladit/ACN
vykurovadlo/MQ
vymoci/ACN
vyradit/ACTN
vytisknout/ACTN
vyzvratit/ACN
vznasedlo/MQ
Zadverice/C
zahustovadlo/MQ
zakvasit/ACN
zardousit/ACN
zastavenicko/MQ
zatahnout/ACN
zboreniste/M
Zdemyslice/C
Zenitcentrum/MQ
zhustit/ACN
zlo/MQ
zmastit/ACN
zpozdit/ACN
zrcadlo/MQR
zvirectvo/MQ
Zabcice/C
zebro/MQ
Zeranovice/C
Zlutice/C
zradlo/MQ
